Illinois, session 104th, SB1587.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act 5is amended by adding Section 16 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 3930/16 new)7    Sec. 16. Homicide reporting.8    (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, the Authority shall study 9and compile and, on a quarterly basis, publish on the 10Authority's public website in a form determined by the 11Authority, the information submitted by the Illinois State 12Police under Section 5-10 of the Uniform Crime Reporting Act. 13    (b) The Authority shall publish the following information 14for each relevant law enforcement agency:15        (1) the number of homicides;16        (2) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm;17        (3) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm 18    and homicides for which an alleged perpetrator has been 19    arrested;20        (4) the number of aggravated assaults with a firearm 21    and homicides that are considered clear or closed for a 22    reason other than an arrest;23        (5) the number of cases described in paragraph (4)   SB1587- 2 -LRB104 10904 RTM 20986 b1    that were cleared or closed because:2            (i) the alleged perpetrator is deceased;3            (ii) the case was rejected by the prosecutor;4            (iii) the suspect is currently incarcerated; or5            (vi) there are other exceptional means outside of 6        law enforcement's control; and7        (6) the number of the cases described in paragraphs 8    (1) and (2) that were referred to the relevant State's 9    Attorney office for prosecution.  10    Section 10. The Uniform Crime Reporting Act is amended by 11changing Sections 5-10 as follows: 12    (50 ILCS 709/5-10)13    Sec. 5-10. Central repository of crime statistics. 14    (a) The Illinois State Police shall be a central 15repository and custodian of crime statistics for the State and 16shall have all the power necessary to carry out the purposes of 17this Act, including the power to demand and receive 18cooperation in the submission of crime statistics from all law 19enforcement agencies. All data and information provided to the 20Illinois State Police under this Act must be provided in a 21manner and form prescribed by the Illinois State Police. On an 22annual basis, the Illinois State Police shall make available 23compilations of crime statistics and monthly reporting 24required to be reported by each law enforcement agency.   SB1587- 3 -LRB104 10904 RTM 20986 b1    (b) Beginning January 1, 2026, on a quarterly basis, the 2Illinois State Police shall submit to the Illinois Criminal 3Justice Information Authority or provide to the Authority 4through a web-based portal the information the Illinois 5Criminal Justice Information Authority is required to publish 6under paragraphs (1) through (5) of subsection (b) of Section 716 of the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Act and that 8the Illinois State Police has collected from law enforcement 9agencies. 10(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22.)